Louisiana, session 2026, HB492.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. Part IV-A of Chapter 2 of Title 49 of the Louisiana Revised Statutes of
1950, comprised of R.S. 49:219.1.1 through 219.1.4, is hereby enacted to read as follows:
PART IV-A. GOVERNOR'S TASK FORCE ON IMPAIRED DRIVING
§219.1.1. Policy and purpose
A. It is the policy of this state to take every responsible action, explore all
opportunities, invite meaningful contributions, and utilize all available resources to
reduce impaired driving involving alcohol, drugs, or a combination of alcohol and
drugs, and to mitigate the resulting loss of life, serious injury, and harm to
individuals, families, and communities.
B. In view of the policy of this state, it is the purpose of this Part to establish
the Governor's Task Force on Impaired Driving as a coordinated, multidisciplinary
body positioned to motivate, advise, and coordinate the efforts of state, parish, and
local agencies, organizations, and stakeholders in addressing impaired driving
through data-driven analysis, effective countermeasures, and collaborative strategies
to improve public safety.
Page 1 of 6
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 492 ENROLLED
§219.1.2. Governor's Task Force on Impaired Driving; establishment; membership;
selection; terms; compensation; organization; domicile; procedure
A. The Governor's Task Force on Impaired Driving is established as a body
corporate to operate within the office of the governor.
B.(1) The task force shall be composed of twenty-three members as follows:
(a) The attorney general or his designee.
(b) One member of the House of Representatives designated by the speaker
of the House of Representatives.
(c) One member of the Senate designated by the president of the Senate.
(d) The commissioner of the office of alcohol and tobacco control or his
designee.
(e) The commissioner of the Department of Public Safety and Corrections,
office of motor vehicles, or his designee.
(f) The executive director of the Louisiana Highway Safety Commission.
(g) The assistant secretary of the office of behavioral health of the Louisiana
Department of Health or his designee.
(h) A representative of the Department of Public Safety and Corrections,
office of state police, designated by the superintendent of the office of state police.
(i) The director of the office of drug policy within the office of the governor.
(j) A representative of the Louisiana State Police Crime Laboratory
designated by the commander of the Louisiana State Police Crime Laboratory.
(k) The secretary of the Department of Transportation and Development or
his designee.
(l) The commissioner of the Louisiana Department of Insurance or his
designee.
(m) A representative of the Louisiana District Attorneys Association
designated by the executive director of the Louisiana District Attorneys Association.
(n) A representative of the Louisiana Sheriffs' Association designated by the
executive director of the Louisiana Sheriffs' Association.
Page 2 of 6
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 492 ENROLLED
(o) A representative of the Louisiana Association of Chiefs of Police
designated by the president of the Louisiana Association of Chiefs of Police.
(p) A representative of Mothers Against Drunk Driving designated by the
highest-ranking staff member of the Louisiana State Office of Mothers Against
Drunk Driving.
(q) A representative of the Louisiana Restaurant Association designated by
the president of the Louisiana Restaurant Association.
(r) The director of the Louisiana Supreme Court Drug and Specialty Court
Office or his designee with expertise in administration of court cases involving
driving while impaired and controlled dangerous substances.
(s) A representative from the American Automobile Association, specializing
in roadside assistance and impaired driving prevention.
(t) Four at-large members appointed by the governor, at least one who shall
be either a victim or family member of a victim of impaired driving.
C.(1) The task force shall be domiciled in the city of Baton Rouge in East
Baton Rouge Parish.
(2) The task force shall establish its own rules of procedure.
(3) Each member shall serve a term concurrent with that of the appointing
governor. Vacancies shall be filled in the same manner as the original appointment.
(4) The members of the task force shall elect the executive director of the
Louisiana Highway Safety Commission who shall serve as chairman of the task force
and may elect other officers as deemed necessary.
(5) The task force shall meet at least four times per calendar year and at the
call of the chairman.
(6) Official action of the task force shall require the affirmative approval of
not less than a majority of those present. A quorum is required to conduct a meeting.
A quorum shall be a majority of the total membership of the board.
(7) Each task force member who is authorized to appoint a designee to serve
in his stead pursuant to Paragraph (B)(1) of this Section shall provide written notice
of such designation to the chairman of the task force. Such written notice shall name
Page 3 of 6
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 492 ENROLLED
the individual who shall be the official designee until the member revokes such
designation. No task force member shall be represented in a meeting other than by
the official designee.
(8) Members shall serve without salary or per diem, but shall be reimbursed
for travel, lodging, and related expenses occasioned by attendance on the business
of the board in the same manner as provided for state employees.
(9) Members shall not receive additional compensation or a per diem from
the office of the governor for serving on the task force.
(10) A task force member who is an employee or an elected public official
of the state or a political subdivision may seek reimbursement of travel expenses
from his employing government agency or elective office in accordance with state
travel guidelines issued by the division of administration.
(11) A task force member who is also a member of the Louisiana Legislature
may, as appropriate, seek a per diem from the House of Representatives or Senate
for his attendance.
D. The office of drug policy within the office of the governor and the
Louisiana Highway Safety Commission shall provide staff, facilities, and resources
for the task force.
§219.1.3. Powers, duties, and functions; staffing; funding
A. The task force shall do all of the following:
(1) Address the high incidence of driving while impaired by alcohol, drugs,
or a combination of alcohol or drugs, including data collection and analysis related
to impaired driving arrest, prosecution and conviction rates, the prevalence of drivers
refusing to submit to chemical testing as directed by law enforcement, and strategies
to reduce such occurrences.
(2) Identify and implement effective impaired driving countermeasures,
including substance use assessment and treatment, electronic monitoring, impaired
driving offender monitoring, ignition interlock devices, sanctions, and other
evidence-based strategies to reduce impaired driving.
Page 4 of 6
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 492 ENROLLED
(3) Analyze data trends related to alcohol-involved, drug-involved, and
polysubstance-involved fatal or serious injury motor vehicle crashes.
(4) Solicit input and recommendations from agencies, departments,
commissions, boards, or offices involved in impaired driving enforcement,
prevention, adjudication, and countermeasures, including law enforcement agencies
at the state, parish, and local levels to support coordinated implementation efforts.
(5) Conduct regular analysis and assessment of Louisiana’s impaired driving
statutes and recommend changes as needed to improve effectiveness.
(6) Evaluate changes in the methods or priorities of the allocation of funds
to state and local agencies.
(7) Align priorities to support the Louisiana Statewide Impaired Driving Plan
as updated annually by the Louisiana Highway Safety Commission and the Strategic
Highway Safety Plan.
(8) Act in an advisory capacity to the governor, office of drug policy within
the office of the governor, the Louisiana Highway Safety Commission, the office of
alcohol and tobacco control, and the office of behavioral health of the Louisiana
Department of Health.
(9) Assess the roles and interaction of federal, state, and local partners
involved in impaired driving enforcement and adjudication, including law
enforcement agencies and related operations, and develop recommendations to
improve the effectiveness of coordinated and multi-jurisdictional efforts to reduce
impaired driving incidents and fatalities throughout the state.
(10) Provide an annual report to the governor by February first of each year
regarding the task force’s findings, activities, and recommendations and provide
additional reports as needed or requested by the governor.
(11) Develop long or short range plans, or both, or strategies that prioritize
areas of need or otherwise organize the use of resources.
(12) Seek assistance or support from any state agency or private sector entity
that may be helpful in preventing, reducing, or mitigating impaired driving involving
alcohol, drugs, or a combination of alcohol and drugs.
Page 5 of 6
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 492 ENROLLED
(13) Adopt and promulgate rules as may be necessary to implement the
provisions of this Part.
B. Staff support shall be provided by the executive office of the governor
and may be provided by the agencies of the executive department of the government
as directed by the governor.
C. The board shall be funded by appropriation of the legislature.
§219.1.4. Assistance and cooperation of other agencies; boards; use of facilities
All state agencies, boards, commissions, departments, and political
subdivisions shall assist the task force in its work by providing requested
information, reports, research, aid, services, and other support, without imposing any
cost or charge to the office of the governor. However, such assistance shall be
subject to the funding constraints of the respective entity. The facilities of the state
library and Louisiana State University shall be available for use by the task force.
The attorney general shall assist the task force and provide written opinions on any
subject requested by the legislative fiscal officer.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 6 of 6
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.